Utah statutes.
48-1d-1202.   Registration to do business in this state.

(1)  A foreign limited liability partnership may not do business in this state until it registers with the division under this part.

(2)  A foreign limited liability partnership doing business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has registered to do business in this state.

(3)  The failure of a foreign limited liability partnership to register to do business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited liability partnership or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

(4)  A limitation on the liability of a partner of a foreign limited liability partnership is not waived solely because the foreign limited liability partnership does business in this state without registering to do business in this state.

(5)  Subsections 48-1d-1201(1) and (2) apply even if a foreign limited liability partnership fails to register under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

